North Carolina, session 2025, SB743.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of twenty million four hundred forty thousand dollars
($20,440,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to
the Town of Davidson for emergency services. These funds shall be used as follows:
(1) Seventeen million dollars ($17,000,000) for the construction of a fire station.
(2) Three million dollars ($3,000,000) to purchase an emergency vehicle.
(3) One hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to purchase police equipment to
enhance community safety.
(4) Three hundred forty thousand dollars ($340,000) to replace breathing
apparatus equipment.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S743-v-1*